California statutes. Business and Professions Code
The form and content of every license issued shall be determined in accordance with Section 164.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 716.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5.5. Funeral Practices [7685. - 7685.6.]

7685.

(a) (1) Every funeral director shall provide to any person, upon beginning discussion of prices or of the funeral goods and services offered, a written or printed list containing, but not necessarily limited to, the price for professional services offered, that may include the funeral director’s services, the preparation of the body, the use of facilities, and the use of automotive equipment. All services included in this price or prices shall be enumerated. The funeral director shall also provide a statement on that list that gives the price range for all caskets offered for sale.

(2) The list shall also include a statement indicating that the survivor of the deceased who is handling the funeral arrangements, or the responsible party, is
 entitled to receive, before the drafting of any contract, a copy of any preneed agreement that has been signed and paid for, in full or in part, by or on behalf of the deceased, and that is in the possession of the funeral establishment.

(3) The funeral director shall also provide a written statement or list that, at a minimum, specifically identifies a particular casket or caskets by price and by thickness of metal, or type of wood, or other construction, interior and color, in addition to other casket identification requirements under Part 453 of Title 16 of the Code of Federal Regulations and any subsequent version of this regulation, when a request for specific information on a casket or caskets is made in person by an individual. Prices of caskets and other identifying features such as thickness of metal, or type of wood, or other construction, interior and color, in addition to other casket identification requirements required to be given
 over the telephone by Part 453 of Title 16 of the Code of Federal Regulations and any subsequent version of this regulation, shall be provided over the telephone, if requested.

(b) (1) Each licensed funeral establishment that maintains an Internet Web site shall post on its Internet Web site the list of funeral goods and services that are required to be included in the establishment’s general price list, pursuant to federal rule, and a statement that the general price list is available upon request.

(2) Information posted pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be provided by a link from the Internet Web site homepage with a word or combination of words, including, but not limited to, “goods,” “merchandise,” “products,” or “services.”

(3) An establishment that posts on its Internet Web site homepage the
 words “price information” or a similar phrase that includes the word “price,” with a link that leads to the establishment’s general price list, need not comply with paragraphs (1) or (2).

(4) This subdivision shall not be construed to affect an establishment’s obligations under federal or state law effective before January 1, 2013.

(5) This subdivision shall become operative on January 1, 2013.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 86, Sec. 13.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

7685.1.

(a) The funeral director shall in a conspicuous manner place the price on each casket. Individual price tags on caskets shall include the thickness of metal, or type of wood, or other construction, as applicable, in addition to interior and color information. Each casket shall be priced individually, irrespective of the type of service purchased. If a funeral director advertises a funeral service for a stated amount, he or she shall display in a reasonably convenient location in the showroom and have available for sale, any casket which is used for determining that price.

(b) No funeral director shall charge the survivor of the deceased who is handling the funeral or burial arrangements or the responsible party a handling fee for a casket supplied by the survivor or responsible party.

(c) No funeral director or embalmer shall charge any additional fee for handling or embalming a body when death was due to a contagious or infectious disease.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 797, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

7685.2.

(a) A funeral director shall not enter into a contract for furnishing services or property in connection with the burial or other disposal of human remains until the funeral director has first submitted to the potential purchaser of those services or property a written or printed memorandum containing the following information, provided that information is available at the time of execution of the contract:

(1) The total charge for the funeral director’s services and the use of the funeral director’s facilities, including the preparation of the body and other professional services, and the charge for the use of automotive and other necessary equipment.

(2) An itemization of charges for the following merchandise as selected: the casket, an outside receptacle, and clothing.

(3) An itemization of fees or charges and the total amount of cash advances made by the funeral director for transportation, flowers, cemetery, crematory, or hydrolysis facility charges, newspaper notices, clergy honorarium, transcripts, telegrams, long distance telephone calls, music, and any other advances as authorized by the purchaser.

(4) An itemization of any other fees or charges not included above.

(5) The total of the amount specified in paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive.

If
 the charge for any of the above items is not known at the time the contract is entered into, the funeral director shall advise the purchaser of the charge therefor, within a reasonable period after the information becomes available. All prices charged for items covered under Sections 7685 and 7685.1 shall be the same as those given under those sections.

(b) A funeral establishment shall obtain from the person with the right to control the disposition pursuant to Section 7100 of the Health and Safety Code, or the person prearranging the cremation or hydrolysis and disposition of the person’s own remains, a signed declaration designating specific instructions with respect to the disposition of cremated remains or hydrolyzed human remains. The bureau shall make available a form upon which the declaration shall be made. The form shall include, but not be
 limited to, the names of the persons with the right to control the disposition of the cremated remains or hydrolyzed human remains and the person who is contracting for the cremation or hydrolysis services; the name of the deceased; the name of the funeral establishment in possession of the remains; the name of the crematorium or hydrolysis facility; and specific instructions regarding the manner, location, and other pertinent details regarding the disposition of cremated remains or hydrolyzed human remains. The form shall be signed and dated by the person arranging for the cremation or hydrolysis and the funeral director, employee, or agent of the funeral establishment in charge of arranging or prearranging the cremation or hydrolysis service.

(c) A funeral director entering into a contract to furnish cremation or hydrolysis services
 shall provide to the purchaser of cremation or hydrolysis services, either on the first page of the contract for cremation or hydrolysis services, or on a separate page attached to the contract, a written or printed notice containing the following information:

(1) A person having the right to control disposition of cremated remains or hydrolyzed human remains may remove the remains in a durable container from the place of cremation, hydrolysis, or interment, pursuant to Section 7054.6 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) If the cremated remains container or hydrolyzed human remains container cannot accommodate all cremated remains or hydrolyzed human remains of the deceased, the crematory or hydrolysis facility shall provide a larger cremated remains container or
 hydrolyzed human remains container at no additional cost, or place the excess in a second container that cannot easily come apart from the first, pursuant to Section 8345 of the Health and Safety Code.

(d) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2027, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 399, Sec. 24.   (AB 351)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.   See later operative version added by Sec. 25 of Stats. 2022, Ch. 399.)
-------------------------------------------

7685.2.

(a) A funeral director shall not enter into a contract for furnishing services or property in connection with the burial or other disposal of human remains until the funeral director has first submitted to the potential purchaser of those services or property a written or printed memorandum containing the following information, if that information is available at the time of execution of the contract:

(1) The total charge for the funeral director’s services and the use of the facilities, including the preparation of the body and other professional services, and the charge for the use of automotive and other necessary equipment.

(2) An itemization of charges for the following merchandise as selected: the casket, an outside receptacle, and clothing.

(3) An itemization of fees or charges and the total amount of cash advances made by the funeral director for transportation, flowers, cemetery, crematory, reduction facility, or hydrolysis facility charges, newspaper notices, clergy honorarium, transcripts, telegrams, long distance telephone calls, music, and any other advances as authorized by the purchaser.

(4) An itemization of any other fees or charges not included above.

(5) The total of the amount specified in paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive.

If
 the charge for any of the above items is not known at the time the contract is entered into, the funeral director shall advise the purchaser of the charge therefor, within a reasonable period after the information becomes available. All prices charged for items covered under Sections 7685 and 7685.1 shall be the same as those given under those sections.

(b) A funeral establishment shall obtain from the person with the right to control the disposition pursuant to Section 7100 of the Health and Safety Code, or the person prearranging the cremation, reduction, or hydrolysis and disposition of the person’s own remains, a signed declaration designating specific instructions with respect to the disposition of cremated, reduced, or hydrolyzed human remains. The bureau shall make available a form upon which the declaration shall be made. The form
 shall include, but not be limited to, the names of the persons with the right to control the disposition of the human remains and the person who is contracting for the cremation, reduction, or hydrolysis services; the name of the deceased; the name of the funeral establishment in possession of the remains; the name of the crematorium, reduction facility, or hydrolysis facility; and specific instructions regarding the manner, location, and other pertinent details regarding the disposition of cremated, reduced, or hydrolyzed human remains. The form shall be signed and dated by the person arranging for the cremation, reduction, or hydrolysis and the funeral director, employee, or agent of the funeral establishment in charge of arranging or prearranging the cremation, reduction, or hydrolysis service.

(c) A funeral director entering into a
 contract to furnish cremation, reduction, or hydrolysis services shall provide to the purchaser of those services, either on the first page of the contract for cremation, reduction, or hydrolysis services, or on a separate page attached to the contract, a written or printed notice containing the following information:

(1) A person having the right to control disposition of cremated remains or hydrolyzed human remains may remove the remains in a durable container from the place of cremation, hydrolysis, or interment, pursuant to Section 7054.6 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) If the cremated remains container or hydrolyzed human remains container cannot accommodate all cremated remains or hydrolyzed human remains of the deceased, the crematory or hydrolysis facility
 shall provide a larger cremated remains container or hydrolyzed human remains container at no additional cost, or place the excess in a second container that cannot easily come apart from the first, pursuant to Section 8345 of the Health and Safety Code.

(3) If the person is contracting for reduction services, the estimated volume of the reduced human remains. The person having the right to control the reduced human remains shall be given the option of receiving none, part, or all of the reduced human remains and shall be notified, if receiving none or only part of the reduced human remains, of the location where the balance of the remains will be integrated into the soil.

(d) This section shall become operative on January 1,
 2027.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 24) and added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 399, Sec. 25.   (AB 351)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

7685.3.

(a) The current address, telephone number, and name of the Department of Consumer Affairs, Cemetery and Funeral Bureau shall appear on the first page of any contract for goods and services offered by a licensee. At a minimum, the information shall be in 8-point boldface type and make this statement:

“FOR MORE INFORMATION ON FUNERAL, CEMETERY, CREMATION, AND HYDROLYSIS MATTERS, CONTACT: DEPARTMENT OF CONSUMER AFFAIRS, CEMETERY AND FUNERAL BUREAU (ADDRESS), (TELEPHONE NUMBER).”

(b) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2027, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 510, Sec. 88.   (SB 887)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.   See later operative version added by Sec. 89 of Stats. 2023, Ch. 510.)
-------------------------------------------

7685.3.

(a) The current address, telephone number, and name of the Department of Consumer Affairs, Cemetery and Funeral Bureau shall appear on the first page of any contract for goods and services offered by a licensee. At a minimum, the information shall be in 8-point boldface type and make this statement:

“FOR MORE INFORMATION ON FUNERAL, CEMETERY, CREMATION, HYDROLYSIS, AND REDUCTION MATTERS, CONTACT: DEPARTMENT OF CONSUMER AFFAIRS, CEMETERY AND FUNERAL BUREAU (ADDRESS), (TELEPHONE NUMBER).”

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2027.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 88) and added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 510, Sec. 89.   (SB 887)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Operative January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

7685.5.

(a) The bureau shall make available to funeral establishments and cemetery authorities a copy of a consumer guide for funeral and cemetery purchases for purposes of reproduction and distribution. The funeral and cemetery guide that is approved by the bureau, in consultation with the funeral and cemetery industries and any other interested parties, shall be made available in printed form and electronically through the Internet.

(b) A licensee shall prominently display and make available to any individual who, in person, inquires about funeral or cemetery purchases, a copy of the consumer guide for funeral and cemetery purchases, reproduced as
 specified in subdivision (a).

(c) Prior to the drafting of a contract for services, the licensee shall provide, for retention, the consumer with a copy of the consumer guide for funeral and cemetery purchases described in subdivisions (a) and (b).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 395, Sec. 22.   (AB 180)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7685.6.

(a) Every funeral establishment, prior to drafting any contract for funeral goods or services, shall present to the survivor of the deceased who is handling the funeral arrangements, or the responsible party, a statement disclosing whether or not the funeral establishment has any preneed agreement made by or on behalf of the deceased. If the funeral establishment has a preneed agreement made by or on behalf of the deceased, the statement shall also declare the establishment’s compliance with Section 7745. The disclosure statement shall be signed and dated by the representative of the funeral establishment and by the survivor or responsible party. The completed disclosure statement shall be retained by the funeral establishment for a period of time determined by the bureau, and a copy shall be given to the survivor or responsible party.

(b) The bureau shall develop a form, in consultation with the funeral industry and any other interested parties, that is separate and distinct from other forms, upon which the disclosure statement shall be made. The bureau shall make the form available to funeral establishments for purposes of reproduction and distribution, and the form shall also be available electronically through the Internet. The form shall be simple and easy to read and shall include all of the following:

(1) The definition of a preneed arrangement, adopted by the bureau by regulation.

(2) A statement of the funeral establishment’s responsibilities under Section 7745.

(3) Information about how the consumer may contact the bureau for more information or how to file a complaint against a licensee.

(c) A violation of this section constitutes grounds for disciplinary action.

(d) This section shall become operative July 1, 2002.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 715, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2002.   Section operative July 1, 2002, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Disciplinary Proceedings [7686. - 7711.12.]

7686.

The bureau may suspend or revoke licenses, after proper notice and hearing to the licensee, if the licensee has been found guilty by the bureau of any of the acts or omissions constituting grounds for disciplinary action. The proceedings under this article shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and the bureau shall have all the powers granted therein.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 568, Sec. 133.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

7686.5.

All accusations against licensees shall be filed with the bureau within two years after the performance of the act or omission alleged as the ground for disciplinary action; provided, however, that the foregoing provision shall not constitute a defense to an accusation alleging fraud or misrepresentation as a ground for disciplinary action. The cause for disciplinary action in such case shall not be deemed to have accrued until discovery, by the bureau, of the facts constituting the fraud or misrepresentation, and, in such case, the accusation shall be filed within three years after such discovery.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 568, Sec. 134.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

7687.

Upon receipt of a complaint, the bureau may make or cause to be made such investigation as it deems necessary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 568, Sec. 135.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

7688.

Notwithstanding any law, in the event of expiration or suspension of a license by operation of law or by order or decision of the director or a court of law, or the voluntary surrender of a license by a cemetery licensee, cemetery owner, cemetery operator, or holder of a cemetery certificate of authority, the director may coordinate and assist with any investigation of or action or criminal proceedings against the cemetery licensee and its officers, agents, or employees that is conducted by another law enforcement entity.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 442, Sec. 4.   (AB 651)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

7690.

The bureau may discipline every accused licensee whose default has been entered or who has been tried and found guilty, after formal hearing, of any act or omission constituting a ground for disciplinary action.

Any of the following penalties may be imposed by the bureau:

(a) Suspension of the disciplinary order.

(b) Reproval, public or private.

(c) Probation.

(d) Suspension of the right to practice.

(e) Revocation of the right to practice.

(f) Such other penalties as the bureau deems fit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 568, Sec. 136.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

7691.

Conviction of a crime substantially related to the qualifications, functions and duties of the license holder in question constitutes a ground for disciplinary action. The record of conviction, or a certified copy thereof, shall be conclusive evidence of such conviction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

7692.

Misrepresentation or fraud in the conduct of the business or the profession of a funeral director or embalmer constitutes a ground for disciplinary action.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 39.)
-------------------------------------------

7692.5.

Any false or misleading statement regarding any law or regulation pertaining to the preparation for burial, transportation for burial, or burial of the dead, made wilfully by a licensee to obtain business as a funeral director or embalmer, constitutes a ground for disciplinary action.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 1383.)
-------------------------------------------

7693.

False or misleading advertising as a funeral establishment, funeral director, or embalmer constitutes a ground for disciplinary action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 970, Sec. 72.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

7694.

Solicitation, after a death or while a death is impending, of funeral directing or embalming business by the licensee, or by the agents, assistants or employees of the licensee, when such solicitation is authorized or ratified by the licensee, constitutes a ground for disciplinary action. This section does not prohibit general advertising.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1941, Ch. 87.)
-------------------------------------------

7695.

Employment by the licensee of persons known as “cappers” or “steerers” or “solicitors,” or other such persons to solicit, after a death or while a death is impending, funeral directing or embalming business constitutes a ground for disciplinary action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1941, Ch. 88.)
-------------------------------------------

7696.

Employment, directly or indirectly, of any apprentice, agent, assistant, embalmer, employee or other person, on part or full time, or on commission, for the purpose of calling upon individuals or institutions by whose influence human remains may be turned over to a particular funeral director or embalmer constitutes a ground for disciplinary action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 970, Sec. 73.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

7697.

The buying, after a death or while a death is impending, of funeral directing and embalming business by the licensee, the licensee’s agents, assistants or employees, or the direct or indirect payment, or offer of payment, of a commission by the licensee, the licensee’s agents, assistants or employees for the purpose of such buying of business, constitutes a ground for disciplinary action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 970, Sec. 74.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

7699.

Aiding or abetting an unlicensed person to practice funeral directing or embalming constitutes a ground for disciplinary action.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 39.)
-------------------------------------------

7700.

Using profane, indecent, or obscene language in the course of the preparation for burial, removal, or other disposition of, or during the funeral service for, human remains, or within the immediate hearing of the family or relatives of a deceased, whose remains have not yet been interred or otherwise disposed of constitutes a ground for disciplinary action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 970, Sec. 75.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

7701.

Solicitation or acceptance by a licensee of any commission or bonus or rebate in consideration of recommending or causing human remains to be disposed of in any crematory, mausoleum or cemetery constitutes a ground for disciplinary action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 970, Sec. 76.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

7701.5.

Solicitation or acceptance by a licensee of any commission or bonus or rebate in consideration of recommending or causing the purchase of flowers from any particular florist or dealer in flowers, for use in connection with a funeral service, constitutes a ground for disciplinary action.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 1240.)
-------------------------------------------

7702.

Using any casket or part of a casket which has previously been used as a receptacle for, or in connection with the burial or other disposition of, human remains constitutes a ground for disciplinary action; provided, however, this section shall not apply to exterior casket hardware which is not sold to the purchaser, or where same is reserved by contract.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 970, Sec. 77.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

7703.

Violation of any of the provisions of this chapter or of the rules and regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter constitutes a ground for disciplinary action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 961.)
-------------------------------------------

7704.

Violation of any state law or municipal or county ordinance or regulation affecting the handling, custody, care or transportation of human remains constitutes a ground for disciplinary action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 970, Sec. 78.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

7705.

Fraud or misrepresentation in obtaining a license constitutes a ground for disciplinary action.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 39.)
-------------------------------------------

7706.

Refusing to surrender promptly the custody of human remains, the personal effects, and any certificate or permit required under Division 102 (commencing with Section 102100) of the Health and Safety Code that is in the possession or control of the licensee upon the express order of the person lawfully entitled to custody of the human remains constitutes a ground for disciplinary action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 874, Sec. 25.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

7707.

Gross negligence, gross incompetence or unprofessional conduct in the practice of funeral directing or embalming constitutes a ground for disciplinary action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 652.)
-------------------------------------------

7708.

The bureau, after a hearing, may deny the application of a funeral establishment, funeral director, embalmer, or apprentice embalmer on proof that the applicant has committed acts or crimes constituting grounds for denial of licensure under Section 480. The record of conviction, or a certified copy thereof, shall be conclusive evidence of the conviction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 568, Sec. 137.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

7709.

A plea or verdict of guilty or a conviction following a plea of nolo contendere is deemed to be a conviction within the meaning of this article. The bureau may order the license suspended or revoked, or may decline to issue a license, when the time for appeal has elapsed, or the judgment of conviction has been affirmed on appeal or when an order granting probation is made suspending the imposition of sentence, irrespective of a subsequent order under the provisions of Section 1203.4 of the Penal Code allowing such person to withdraw his plea of guilty and to enter a plea of not guilty, or setting aside the verdict of guilty, or dismissing the accusation, information or indictment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 568, Sec. 138.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

7711.

When a funeral establishment, funeral director or embalmer has had his, or her, or its license suspended, canceled, or revoked by the bureau, the bureau, upon written application by the licensee affected, upon not less than 10 days’ notice to all parties of record in the particular case, and after hearing all evidence offered in support of and in opposition to that application, may, in its discretion, and upon those terms as it may deem just, reinstate the applicant.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 568, Sec. 139.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

7711.1.

Unprofessional conduct by any licensee or registrant or by any agent or employee of a licensee or registrant constitutes grounds for disciplinary action. Unprofessional conduct includes, but is not limited to, the following:

(a) Violating or attempting to violate, directly or indirectly, or assisting in or abetting the violation of this chapter and any regulation adopted thereunder, or of any federal or state law or regulation governing the disposition of human remains, operation of cemeteries or crematories, the sale of cemetery property, or the sale of crematory services or commodities.

(b) Negligence in performing any act related to the operation of a cemetery or crematory.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 395, Sec. 23.   (AB 180)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7711.2.

The bureau may, upon its own motion, and shall, upon the verified complaint in writing of any person, investigate the actions of any person engaged in the business or acting in the capacity of a cemetery licensee, and may temporarily suspend or permanently revoke a license at any time where the licensee, within the immediately preceding three years, while a cemetery licensee in performing or attempting to perform any of the acts specified in this act, has been guilty of any of the following:

(a) Making any substantial misrepresentation.

(b) Making any false statement of a character likely to influence or persuade.

(c) A continued and flagrant course of misrepresentation or making of false promises through cemetery agents or salespersons.

(d) Acting for more than one party in a transaction without the knowledge or consent of all parties thereto.

(e) Commingling the money or other property of his or her principal with his or her own.

(f) The practice of claiming or demanding a fee, compensation, or commission under any exclusive agreement authorizing or employing a licensee to sell, buy, or exchange cemetery property for compensation or commission where such agreement does not contain a definite, specified date of final and complete termination.

(g) The claiming or taking by a licensee of any secret or undisclosed amount of compensation, commission, or profit or the failure of a licensee to reveal to the employer of such licensee the full amount of such licensee’s compensation, commission, or profit under any agreement authorizing or employing such licensee to sell, buy, or exchange cemetery property for compensation or commission prior to or coincident with the signing of such agreement
 evidencing the meeting of the minds of the contracting parties, regardless of the form of such agreement, whether evidenced by documents in an escrow or by any other or different procedure.

(h) The use by a licensee of any provision allowing the licensee an option to purchase in an agreement authorizing or employing such licensee to sell, buy, or exchange cemetery property for compensation or commission, except when such licensee prior to or coincident with election to exercise such option to purchase reveals in writing to the employer the full amount of the licensee’s profit and obtains the written consent of the employer approving the amount of such profit.

(i) Any other conduct, whether of the same or a different character than specified in this section, which constitutes fraud or dishonest dealing.

(j) The misrepresentations and false statements mentioned in this section also include misrepresentation and false statements as to other property than that which the cemetery licensee may be selling or attempting to sell.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 395, Sec. 24.   (AB 180)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7711.3.

The bureau may suspend or revoke the license of any cemetery licensee who, within the immediately preceding three years, has done any of the following:

(a) Been convicted of a crime substantially related to the qualifications, functions, and duties of such licensee. The record of conviction, or a certified copy thereof, shall be conclusive evidence of such conviction.

(b) Knowingly authorized, directed, connived at, or aided in the publication, advertisement, distribution, or circulation of any material false
 statement or representation concerning his or her business or any cemetery property offered for sale.

(c) Willfully disregarded or violated any of the provisions of this act relating to cemetery brokerage.

(d) Acted or conducted himself or herself in a manner which would have warranted the denial of his or her application for a cemetery license, or for a renewal thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 395, Sec. 25.   (AB 180)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7711.4.

When any salesperson is discharged by his or her employer for a violation of any of the provisions of this article prescribing a ground for disciplinary action, a verified written statement of the facts with reference thereto shall be filed forthwith with the bureau by the employer and, if the employer fails to notify the bureau as required by this section, the bureau may temporarily suspend or permanently revoke the cemetery license of the employer in accordance with the provisions of this act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 395, Sec. 26.   (AB 180)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7711.5.

The bureau may deny, suspend, or revoke the cemetery license of a corporation as to any officer or agent acting under its cemetery license, and the cemetery license of a copartnership as to any member acting under its cemetery license, without revoking the cemetery license of the corporation or of the copartnership.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 395, Sec. 27.   (AB 180)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7711.6.

The fees for cemetery licenses at all periods of the fiscal year is the same as provided in this article. All cemetery license fees are payable in advance of issuing the licenses and at the time of filing the application. All licenses shall be issued for the fiscal year and shall expire on June 30 of each fiscal year at midnight.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 395, Sec. 28.   (AB 180)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7711.7.

(a) If a person fails to apply for a license renewal, no renewal license shall be issued except upon payment of the delinquent renewal fee required under Section 7729.2.

(b) A person who fails to renew his or her license within one year of the expiration date shall not engage in any of the activities authorized by a license unless he or she first files the application required for an original license, pays the original license fee, and otherwise complies with all of the provisions of this act pertaining to the issuance of an original license.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 395, Sec. 29.   (AB 180)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7711.8.

The definitions contained in this article are solely for the purposes of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 395, Sec. 30.   (AB 180)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7711.9.

An original cemetery broker’s license is a cemetery license issued to a person who did not have a cemetery broker’s license on June 30 of the fiscal year previous to the fiscal year for which the license is issued.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 395, Sec. 31.   (AB 180)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7711.10.

A renewal cemetery broker’s license is a cemetery license issued to a person who had a cemetery broker’s license unrevoked and unsuspended on June 30 of the fiscal year previous to the fiscal year for which the renewal cemetery license is issued.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 395, Sec. 32.   (AB 180)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7711.11.

An original cemetery salesperson’s license is a cemetery license issued to a person who did not have a cemetery salesperson’s or a broker’s license either individually or as an officer of a corporation, or as a member of a copartnership, on June 30 of the fiscal year previous to the fiscal year for which the salesperson’s license is issued.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 395, Sec. 33.   (AB 180)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7711.12.

A renewal cemetery salesperson’s license is a cemetery license issued to a person who had a cemetery salesperson’s or a broker’s license either individually or as an officer of a corporation, or as a member of a copartnership, on June 30 of the fiscal year previous to the fiscal year for which the salesperson’s license is issued.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 395, Sec. 34.   (AB 180)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6.5. Crematories [7712. - 7713.4.]

7712.

A crematory established, operated, or maintained, may be operated by a corporation, partnership, or natural person, provided that a valid crematory license shall have been issued by the bureau.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 395, Sec. 35.   (AB 180)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7712.1.

(a) Any change in the ownership of a crematory shall be reported to the bureau.

(b) Any transfer in a single transaction or a related series of transactions of more than 50 percent of the equitable interest in a licensed crematory shall constitute a change of ownership.

(c) When a change of ownership in a crematory occurs, all of the following apply:

(1) The new owner may submit an application to assign the crematory license.

(2) If the new owner submits an application pursuant to paragraph (1), the new owner shall submit the application at least 30 days before the change of ownership occurs.

(3) If the new owner submits an application pursuant to paragraph (1), the new owner shall pay the fee described in subdivision (b) of Section 7712.9.

(4) If the new owner submits an application pursuant to paragraph (1), the bureau shall approve or disapprove the application.
